scripts/g2pUdarTags.twolc
Alphabet

      G:0 P:0 L:0 D:0 I:0 Y:0 S:0  ! Udar Morphology
      !Gen Pl3 Loc Dat Ins -я -ясь

      %  ! space
      %-

      Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
      Ъ:0 Ь:0
      А   Е   Ё:О́ И О У Ы Э   Ю:У Я
      А́ А̂ Е́:Э́ Ё́   И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Э̂ Ю́:У́ Я́:А́

      б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ
      ъ:0 ь:0
      а   е   ё:о́ и  о у ы э   ю:у я   ʌ
      а́ â е́:э́ ё́   и́  о́ у́ ы́ э́ э̂ ю́:у́ я́:а́ 0:'    ! ё́ is included to broaden coverage
      ;

Sets

! Consonants
C = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
    б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;

! Consonants, excluding { Ж ж Й й Ч ч Ш ш Щ щ Ц ц }
CNoSoftHard = Б В Г Д З К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х
              б в г д з к л м н п р с т ф х ;

! Unvoiced and paired consonants
UnvoicedPairedC = К П С Т Ф Ш
                  к п с т ф ш ;

! Voiced and paired consonants
VoicedPairedCNoB = Б Г Д Ж З
                   б г д ж з ;

! Soft consonants
SoftC = Й Ч Щ
        й ч щ ;

! Hard consonants
HardC = Ж Ц Ш
        ж ц ш ;

! Labials for Softness Assimilation
LAB = Б б В в М м П п Ф ф ;

! Dentals for Softness Assimilation
DEN = Д д З з Л л Н н Р р С с Т т Ц ц ;

! Velars for Softness Assimilation
VEL = Г г К к Х х ;

! Vowels
V = А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я
    А́ Е́ Ё́ И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
    А̀ Ѐ Ё̀ Ѝ О̀ У̀ Ы̀ Э̀ Ю̀ Я̀
    а е ё и о у ы э ю я
    а́ е́ ё́ и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́
    а̀ ѐ ё̀ ѝ о̀ у̀ ы̀ э̀ ю̀ я̀ ;

! Stressed vowels
StressedV = А́ Е́ Ё́ Ё И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
            а́ е́ ё́ ё и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́ ;

! Unstressed vowels
UnstressedV = А Е И О У Ы Э Ю Я
              а е и о у ы э ю я ;

! Vowels that indicate softness
SoftV = Е Ё И Ю Я
        Е́ Ё́ И́ Ю́ Я́
        е ё и ю я
        е́ ё́ и́ ю́ я́ ;

YaEndings = P L D I Y S ;

Definitions

Rules

! TODO: как дела - across word boundaries

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 00: Soften consonants before 'soft' vowels and ь (excluding { Ж ж Ц ц Ш ш Ч ч Щ щ Й й })"
0:' <=> [CNoSoftHard: - [ Т: | т: | С: | с: ]] _ [ SoftV: | ь: | Ь: ] ;
        [ Т: | т: ] _ [ ь: | Ь: ] [: - [ С: | с: ]] ;
        [ Т: | т: ] _ [ SoftV: ] ;
        [[: - [ Т: | т: ]] [ ь: | Ь: ] | [: - [ Т: | т: |  ь: | Ь: ]]] [ С: | с: ] _ [ SoftV: | ь: | Ь: ] ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 01: 0>й (lowercase) between vowels, word-initially, and after hard-/soft-signs"
0:й <=> [ V: | ь: | ъ: | .#. ] _ [ ю́: | ю: | ё: | я́: | я: | е́: | е: ] ;
        [ ь: | ъ: ] _ [ и́: | и: ] ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 02: 0>Й (uppercase) between vowels, word-initially, and after hard-/soft-signs"
0:Й <=> [ V: | Ь: | Ъ: | .#. ] _ [ Ю́: | Ю: | Ё: | Я́: | Я: | Е́: | Е: ] ;
        [ Ь: | Ъ: ] _ [ И́: | И: ] ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 03: Yeri rule: after hard consonants и is pronounced as ы"
Vx:Vy <=> HardC _ ;
where Vx in ( И́ И и́ и )
      Vy in ( Ы́ Ы ы́ ы )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 04: Akanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { о а } in pre-tonic location and word-initially"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - StressedV:] _ [:C | ь: | :']* StressedV: ;
          .#. _ ;
where Vx in ( О о А а )
      Vy in ( ʌ ʌ ʌ ʌ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 05a: Akanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { о а } in non-pre-tonic and post-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - .#.] _ [: - [StressedV: | :ʌ]] [[ C: | ь: | :']* UnstressedV: [ C: | ь: | :']* ]+ StressedV: ;
          StressedV: :* _ [: - [StressedV: | :ʌ]]* .#. ;
where Vx in ( О о А а )
      Vy in ( Ъ ъ Ъ ъ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 05b: Akanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { о а } in non-pre-tonic"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - .#.] _ [ О:ʌ | о:ʌ ] ;
where Vx in ( О о )
      Vy in ( ʌ ʌ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 05c: Akanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { о а } in non-pre-tonic"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - .#.] _ [ А:ʌ | а:ʌ ] ;
where Vx in ( А а )
      Vy in ( ʌ ʌ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 06: Tense я́ and е́"
Vx:Vy <=> [ :CNoSoftHard :' | :SoftC ] _ [ :CNoSoftHard :' | :SoftC ] ;
where Vx in ( Я́ я́ А́ а́ Е́ е́ )
      Vy in ( А̂ а̂ А̂ а̂ Э̂ э̂ )
 matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 07: Ikanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { я е } in pre-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - [ HardC: ]] _ [:C | ь: | :']* StressedV: ;
where Vx in ( Я я Е е )
      Vy in ( И и И и )
 matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 8: Ikanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { я } in non-pre-tonic location, word-initially and post-tonic"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - [ HardC: ]] _ [ [ C: | ь: | :']* UnstressedV: [ C: | ь: | :']* ]+ StressedV: ;
          StressedV: [: - [ HardC:]]* _ [: - [StressedV: | YaEndings: ]]* .#. ;
where Vx in ( Я я )
      Vy in ( Ь ь )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 9: Ikanje: Unstressed vowel reduction for { е } in non-pre-tonic location, word-initially and post-tonic"
Vx:Vy <=> [: - [ HardC: ]] _ [ [ C: | ь: | :']* UnstressedV: [ C: | ь: | :']* ]+ StressedV: ;
        StressedV: [: - [ HardC:]]* _ [: - [StressedV:]]* .#. ;
where Vx in ( Е е )
      Vy in ( Ь ь )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 10: Ykanje: unstressed vowel reduction for { е } after { ж ш ц } in pre-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> .#. [: - StressedV:]* HardC: _ [ C: | ь: | :']* StressedV: ;
where Vx in ( Е е )
      Vy in ( Ы ы )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 11: Ykanje: unstressed е after { ж ш ц } in non-pre-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> HardC: _ [ [ C: | ь: | :']* UnstressedV: [ C: | ь: | :']* ]+ StressedV: ;
         StressedV: :* HardC: _ ;
where Vx in ( Е е )
      Vy in ( Ъ ъ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 12: Voice Assimilation: Final devoicing"
Cx:Cy <=> _ [ :' | :0 ]* [ G: | YaEndings: ]* .#. ;
where Cx in ( Б б В в Г г Д д Ж ж З з )
      Cy in ( П п Ф ф К к Т т Ш ш С с )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 13: Unvoiced Assimilation: Consonant clusters with unvoiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=>  _ [ :' | :0 ]* :UnvoicedPairedC ;
where Cx in ( Б б В в Г г Д д Ж ж З з )
      Cy in ( П п Ф ф К к Т т Ш ш С с )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 14: Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with voiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=>  _ [ :' | :0 ]* :VoicedPairedCNoB ;
where Cx in ( П п Ф ф К к Ш ш )
      Cy in ( Б б В в Г г Ж ж )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 15: Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with voiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=>  _ ( :' ) ( Ь:0 | ь:0 ) [:VoicedPairedCNoB - [ С: | с: ]] ;
where Cx in ( Т т )
      Cy in ( Д д )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 16: Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with voiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=> .#. [:* - [:* [ Т: | т: ]]] ( :' ) ( Ь:0 | ь:0 ) _ ( :' ) ( Ь:0 | ь:0 ) :VoicedPairedCNoB ;
where Cx in ( С с )
      Cy in ( З з )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 17: Softness Assimilation: Dentals, Labials, Velars"
0:' <=> :DEN _ :DEN :' ;
        :LAB _ :LAB :' ;
        :VEL _ :VEL :' ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 18: Conversion of г to в"
Vx:Vy <=> [ о: | о́: | е: | О: | О́: | Е: ] _ [ о: | о́: | О: | О́:] G: YaEndings:* .#. ;
where Vx in ( Г г )
      Vy in ( В в )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 19: я in Endings"
Vx:Vy <=> _ [ т: | Т: ] P: .#. ;               !P ят
          _ [ х: | Х: ] L: .#. ;               !L ях
          _ [ м: | М: ] D: .#. ;               !D ям
          _ [ м: | М: ] :' [ и: |  И: ] I: .#. ;  !I ями
          _ G:* YaEndings:* Y: .#. ;                       !Y я
          _ [ с: | С: ] (:') [ ь: | Ь: ] YaEndings:* S:  .#. ;   !S ясь
where Vx in ( Я я )
      Vy in ( Ъ ъ )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 20: Conversion of { т } in endings { тся } to { ц }"
Vx:Vy <=> _ ( Ь: | ь: ) [ С: | с: ] ;
where Vx in ( Т т )
      Vy in ( Ц ц )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 21: Conversion of { с } in endings { тся } to { 0 }"
Vx:Vy <=> [ т: | Т: ] ( Ь: | ь: ) _ ;
where Vx in ( С с )
      Vy in ( 0 0 )
  matched ;
